Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201276-3421
Medicaid assistance; Department of
Health and Human Services; powers.

The Department of Health and Human Services
may require revocation of a transfer on death deed by a transferor, a transferor's
spouse, or both a transferor and the transferor's spouse in order for the
transferor to qualify or remain qualified for medicaid assistance.

Laws 2012, LB536, § 21.